Utah statutes.
79-4-701.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Board of trustees" means the board of trustees of This is the Place Foundation.

(2)  "Foundation" means This is the Place Foundation, a private nonprofit corporation formed pursuant to Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act.

(3)  "Member" means a member of the board of trustees.

(4)  "Monument" means This is the Place Monument at This is the Place State Park.

(5)  "Park" means This is the Place State Park, property owned by the state located at 2601 East Sunnyside Avenue, Salt Lake City.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

